es: Aplicación del aceite para camping: Combustible para hornillo; Iniciador de fuego; Combustible repelente de insectos; Combustible para linterna o lámpara; Lubricación; Multiuso; Combustible para antorcha o tiki; Otro
vi: Công dụng dầu cắm trại: Nhiên liệu bếp nấu; Mồi lửa; Nhiên liệu đuổi côn trùng; Nhiên liệu đèn lồng hoặc đèn; Bôi trơn; Đa năng; Nhiên liệu đuốc; Khác
en: Camping oil application: Cooking stove fuel; Fire starter; Insect repellent fuel; Lantern or lamp fuel; Lubrication; Multipurpose; Torch or tiki fuel; Other
el: Εφαρμογή λαδιού παραφίνης: Καύσιμο για μαγειρικό μάτι; Προσανάμμα; Εντομοαπωθητικό καύσιμο; Καύσιμο για φανάρι ή λάμπα; Λίπανση; Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Καύσιμο για πυρσό ή δάδα; Άλλο
fr: Utilisation de l'huile de camping: Combustible pour réchaud de cuisson; Allume-feu; Combustible insectifuge; Combustible pour lanterne ou lampe; Lubrification; Polyvalent; Combustible pour torche ou tiki; Autre
sl-SI: Aplikacija olja za kampiranje: Gorivo za kuhalnik; Pripomoček za prižiganje ognja; Gorivo za odganjanje žuželk; Gorivo za svetilke; Mazanje; Večnamensko; Gorivo za bakle; Drugo
ru: Применение масла для кемпинга: Топливо для горелок; Средство для розжига; Топливо с репеллентом от насекомых; Топливо для ламп или фонарей; Смазка; Многоцелевое; Топливо для факелов; Другое
hu: Kempingolaj felhasználása: Kályhaüzemanyag főzéshez; Tűzgyújtó; Rovarriasztó üzemanyag; Lámpaolaj; Kenés; Többcélú; Fáklya- vagy tiki olaj; Egyéb
ja: キャンピングオイル適用: クッキングストーブ燃料; 着火剤; 虫除け用燃料; ランタンまたはランプ用燃料; 潤滑; 多目的; トーチまたはティキ用燃料; その他
bg-BG: Приложение на маслото за къмпинг: Гориво за готварска печка; Подпалки; Гориво против насекоми; Гориво за фенери или лампи; Смазване; Многоцелево; Гориво за факли или тики; Други
hr-HR: Primjena ulja za kampiranje: Gorivo za kuhalo; Sredstvo za potpalu; Gorivo za repelent protiv insekata; Gorivo za fenjer ili lampu; Podmazivanje; Višenamjensko; Gorivo za baklje ili tiki baklje; Ostalo
ko: 헤어 오일 적용: 조리용 스토브 연료; 파이어 스타터(점화제); 벌레 퇴치제 연료; 랜턴 또는 램프 연료; 윤활; 다목적; 토치 또는 티키 연료; 기타
pl: Zastosowanie oleju kempingowego: Paliwo do kuchenek turystycznych; Rozpałka; Paliwo odstraszające owady; Paliwo do latarni lub lamp; Smarowanie; Wielozadaniowe; Paliwo do pochodni; Inne
sv: Campingoljeapplicering: Bränsle för stormkök; Tändmedel; Myggavvisande bränsle; Bränsle för lykta/lampa; Smörjmedel; Allround; Bränsle för fackla; Övrigt
fi: Öljyn käyttö leirinnässä: Retkikeittimen polttoaine; Sytyke; Hyönteiskarkottimen polttoaine; Lyhdyn tai lampun polttoaine; Voitelu; Monikäyttö; Soidun polttoaine; Muu
pt-PT: Aplicação do óleo para campismo: Combustível para fogareiro; Acendalha; Combustível repelente de insetos; Combustível para lanterna ou candeeiro; Lubrificação; Multiusos; Combustível para tocha; Outro
lt-LT: Stovyklavimo aliejaus paskirtis: Viryklių kuras; Ugnies įkūrimo priemonė; Vabzdžius atbaidantis kuras; Žibintų arba lempų kuras; Tepimas; Daugiafunkcis; Degiklams arba „Tiki“ fakelams skirtas kuras; Kita
nb: Bruk av campingolje: Kokeapparatdrivstoff; Opptenning; Drivstoff for insektmiddel; Drivstoff for lanterne eller lampe; Smøring; Flerbruk; Fakkel- eller tikidrivstoff; Annet
cs: Použití kempingového oleje: Palivo do vařiče; Podpalovač; Palivo s repelentem proti hmyzu; Palivo do lucerny nebo lampy; Mazání; Víceúčelové; Palivo do pochodně nebo tiki; Jiné
zh-CN: 露营燃油应用: 炊事炉灶燃料; 引火剂; 驱虫燃料; 露营灯燃料; 润滑; 多用途; 火炬或提基火把燃料; 其他
tr: Kamp yağı kullanım amacı: Pişirme ocağı yakıtı; Ateş başlatıcı; Böcek kovucu yakıt; Fener veya lamba yakıtı; Yağlama; Çok amaçlı; Meşale veya tiki yakıtı; Diğer
zh-TW: 露營油品應用: 烹飪爐具燃料; 起火劑; 驅蟲燃料; 燈籠或燈具燃料; 潤滑; 多用途; 火把或提基火把燃料; 其他
nl: Gebruik campingolie: Brandstof voor kooktoestel; Vuurstarter; Insectenwerende brandstof; Lantaarn- of lampbrandstof; Smering; Multifunctioneel; Fakkelbrandstof; Overig
da: Påføring af campingolie: Brændstof til kogeapparat; Optænding; Brændstof til myggeafviser; Brændstof til lanterne eller lampe; Smøring; Flere formål; Brændstof til fakkel eller tiki; Andet
th: การใช้งานน้ำมันสำหรับตั้งแคมป์: เชื้อเพลิงเตาทำอาหาร; เชื้อเพลิงจุดไฟ; เชื้อเพลิงไล่แมลง; เชื้อเพลิงตะเกียงหรือโคมไฟ; น้ำมันหล่อลื่น; อเนกประสงค์; เชื้อเพลิงคบเพลิงหรือทิกิ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Použitie kempingového oleja: Palivo do varičov; Podpaľač; Palivo na odpudzovanie hmyzu; Palivo do lampášov alebo lámp; Mazanie; Viacúčelové; Palivo do faklí alebo tiki lámp; Iné
it: Applicazione dell'olio da campeggio: Combustibile per fornelli da campeggio; Accendifuoco; Combustibile repellente per insetti; Combustibile per lanterne o lampade; Lubrificazione; Multiuso; Combustibile per torce o fiaccole (tiki); Altro
de: Campingölanwendung: Brennstoff für Kocher; Feuerstarter; Brennstoff zur Insektenabwehr; Laternen- oder Lampenbrennstoff; Schmiermittel; Mehrzweck; Fackel- oder Tiki-Brennstoff; Sonstige
pt-BR: Aplicação de óleo para acampamento: Combustível para fogareiro; Acendedor; Combustível com repelente de insetos; Combustível para lanterna ou lâmpião; Lubrificação; Multiuso; Combustível para tocha ou tiki; Outro
ro-RO: Aplicarea uleiului de camping: Combustibil pentru arzător de gătit; Aprinzător de foc; Combustibil repelent împotriva insectelor; Combustibil pentru felinar sau lampă; Lubrifiere; Multifuncțional; Combustibil pentru torțe sau tiki; Altele